en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Fencing: Fencing Protective Gear; Fencing Scoring Equipment; Fencing Shoes; Fencing Training Aids; Fencing Weapons
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > フェンシング用品: フェンシング用プロテクター; フェンシング採点装置; フェンシングシューズ; フェンシング練習器具; フェンシング剣
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Szermierka: Ochraniacze do szermierki; Sprzęt do punktacji w szermierce; Buty szermiercze; Pomoce treningowe do szermierki; Broń do szermierki
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Vívás: Vivó-védőfelszerelés; Vívás-pontozófelszerelés; Vívócipők; Vívás-edzési segédeszközök; Vívófegyverek
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 击剑: 击剑护具; 击剑记分设备; 击剑鞋; 击剑训练辅助用品; 击剑用剑
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Eskrim: Eskrim Koruyucu Giysileri; Eskrim Puanlama Ekipmanları; Eskrim ayakkabıları; Eskrim Eğitim Araçları; Eskrim Silahları
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Esgrima: Equipamentos de proteção para esgrima; Equipamento de pontuação para esgrima; Tênis de esgrima; Auxílios de treinamento para esgrima; Armas de esgrima
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Mačevanje: Zaštitna oprema za mačevanje; Oprema za bodovanje u mačevanju; Obuća za mačevanje; Pomagala za trening mačevanja; Oružje za mačevanje
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Đấu kiếm hiện đại: Đồ bảo hộ môn đấu kiếm; Thiết bị ghi tỉ số đấu kiếm; Giày đấu kiếm; Dụng cụ hỗ trợ tập luyện đấu kiếm; Kiếm đấu
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Fægtning: Fægteudstyr; Fægtescoreudstyr; Fægtesko; Træningshjælpemidler til fægtning; Fægtevåben
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Esgrima: Equipamento de proteção para esgrima; Equipamento de pontuação para esgrima; Calçado de esgrima; Auxiliares de treino para esgrima; Armas para esgrima
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Scrimă: Echipamente de protecție scrimă; Echipamente scor scrimă; Încălțăminte pentru scrimă; Articole pentru antrenament scrimă; Arme pentru scrimă
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Fechten: Fechtschutzbekleidung; Fechtmelder; Fechtschuhe; Fecht-Trainingshilfen; Sportfechtwaffen
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Šerm: Ochranné vybavenie na šerm; Vybavenie na hodnotenie šermu; Šermiarske topánky; Tréningové šermiarske pomôcky; Šermiarske zbrane
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Фехтование: Защитная экипировка для фехтования; Оборудование для подсчета очков в фехтовании; Обувь для фехтования; Тренировочный инвентарь для фехтования; Оружие для фехтования
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Šerm: Šermířské ochranné pomůcky; Šermířské bodovací vybavení; Šermířská obuv; Tréninkové pomůcky na šerm; Šermířské zbraně
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Schermen: Beschermende uitrusting voor schermen; Schermscoreapparatuur; Schermschoenen; Schermtrainingshulpmiddelen; Schermwapens
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 擊劍: 擊劍護具; 擊劍記分設備; 擊劍鞋; 擊劍訓練輔助用具; 擊劍武器
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Scherma: Attrezzatura protettiva scherma; Attrezzatura per il punteggio della scherma; Scarpe da scherma; Ausili per allenamenti di scherma; Armi da scherma
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Fekting: Beskyttelsesutstyr for fekting; Scoreutstyr for fekting; Fektesko; Treningsutstyr for fekting; Fektevåpen
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Фехтовка: Защитна екипировка за фехтовка; Оборудване за отбелязване на точки по фехтовка; Обувки за фехтовка; Помощни средства за тренировка по фехтовка; Оръжия за фехтовка
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Esgrima: Equipo de protección para esgrima; Equipo de puntuación de esgrima; Zapatillas de esgrima; Ayudas para el entrenamiento de esgrima; Armas de esgrima
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Ξιφασκία: Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός ξιφασκίας; Εξοπλισμός βαθμολόγησης ξιφασκίας; Παπούτσια ξιφασκίας; Εκπαιδευτικά βοηθήματα ξιφασκίας; Όπλα ξιφασκίας
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Escrime: Tenue d'escrime; Équipement de notation d'escrime; Chaussures d'escrime; Aides à l'entraînement à l'escrime; Armes d'escrime
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > การฟันดาบ: อุปกรณ์ป้องกันสำหรับดาบสากล; อุปกรณ์นับคะแนนฟันดาบ; รองเท้าฟันดาบ; อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมฟันดาบ; ดาบสากล
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Fäktning: Skyddsutrustning för fäktning; Poängutrustning för fäktning; Fäktskor; Hjälpmedel för fäktning; Fäktvapen
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Miekkailu: Miekkailusuojat; Miekkailun pisteytyslaitteet; Miekkailukengät; Miekkailun harjoitteluvälineet; Miekkailuaseet
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Fechtavimas: Fechtavimo apsauginės priemonės; Fechtavimo taškų skaičiavimo įranga; Fechtavimo batai; Fechtavimo treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės; Fechtavimo ginklai
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Sabljanje: Zaščitna oprema za sabljanje; Oprema za ocenjevanje sabljanja; Čevlji za sabljanje; Pripomočki za vadbo sabljanja; Sabljaško orožje
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 펜싱: 펜싱 보호 장비; 펜싱 점수 장비; 펜싱화; 펜싱 훈련 장비; 펜싱 검